th: ที่หุ้มเข็มขัดนิรภัยตำแหน่งวางของ: สายรัดหน้าอก; เข็มขัดคาดเอว; สายคาดไหล่; อเนกประสงค์ (ตำแหน่งใดก็ได้); อื่นๆ
en: Seat belt cover placement: Chest strap; Lap belt; Shoulder strap; Universal (any position); Other
pt-PT: Colocação da capa do cinto de segurança: Cinta de peito; Cinto subabdominal; Cinto de ombro; Universal (qualquer posição); Outro
ko: 안전벨트 커버 장착 위치: 가슴 스트랩; 랩 벨트; 어깨 스트랩; 범용(전체 위치); 기타
pl: Położenie osłony pasa bezpieczeństwa: Pasek piersiowy; Pas biodrowy; Pasek naramienny; Uniwersalne (dowolna pozycja); Inne
pt-BR: Cinto de segurança posicionamento da capa: Tira de peito; Cinto abdominal; Tira de ombro; Universal (qualquer posição); Outros
es: Ubicación de la funda para cinturón de seguridad: Correa del pecho; Cinturón de regazo; Correa del hombro; Universal (cualquier posición); Otro
hu: Biztonságiöv-borítás elhelyezkedése: Mellkaspánt; Medenceöv; Vállpánt; Univerzális (bármilyen pozíció); Egyéb
bg-BG: Разположение на калъфа на предпазния колан: Гръден колан; Надбедрен колан; Презраменен колан; Универсално (всяка позиция); Други
da: Placering af sikkerhedsselebetræk: Bryststrop; Hoftesele; Skulderstrop; Universal (enhver position); Andet
sl-SI: Namestitev prevleke za varnostni pas: Prsni trak; Trebušni pas; Ramenski trak; Univerzalno (kateri koli položaj); Drugo
hr-HR: Položaj navlake sigurnosnog pojasa: Prsni pojas; Pojas preko krila; Rameni pojas; Univerzalno (bilo koji položaj); Ostalo
ja: シートベルトカバーの配置: チェストストラップ; ラップベルト; ショルダーストラップ; ユニバーサル (任意の位置); その他
fi: Turvavyön suojuksen paikka: Rintahihna; Lantiovyö; Olkahihna; Yleiskäyttöinen (mikä tahansa sijainti); Muu
nl: Veiligheidsgordel afdekking plaatsing: Borstriem; Heupgordel; Schoudergordel; Universeel (elke positie); Overig
de: Position der Sicherheitsgurtabdeckung: Brustgurt; Beckengurt; Schultergurt; Universell (jede Position); Sonstige
ru: Размещение накладки на ремень безопасности: Нагрудный ремень; Поясной ремень; Плечевой ремень; Универсальное (любая позиция); Другое
nb: Plassering av sikkerhetsbeltetrekk: Bryststropp; Hoftebelte; Skulderstropp; Universell (hvilken som helst posisjon); Annet
zh-TW: 安全帶護套放置: 胸帶; 腰部安全帶; 肩帶; 通用 (任何位置); 其他
cs: Kryt bezpečnostního pásu: Hrudní popruh; Břišní pás; Ramenní popruh; Univerzální (jakákoli poloha); Jiné
ro-RO: Amplasarea husei pentru centura de siguranță: Curea de piept; Centură subabdominală; Curea de umăr; Universal (orice poziție); Altele
sk-SK: Umiestnenie krytu bezpečnostného pásu: Hrudný popruh; Bedrový pás; Ramenný popruh; Univerzálne (akákoľvek poloha); Iné
tr: Emniyet kemeri kılıfı yerleşimi: Göğüs kayışı; Karın kemeri; Omuz kayışı; Evrensel (her konum); Diğer
fr: Emplacement du passage de la ceinture: Sangle de poitrine; Ceinture abdominale; Sangle d'épaule; Universel (toute position); Autre
zh-CN: 安全带盖板位置: 胸部安全带; 腹部安全带; 肩部安全带; 通用（任意位置）; 其他
it: Posizionamento della copertura della cintura di sicurezza: Cinghia pettorale; Cintura addominale; Cinghia da spalla; Universale (qualsiasi posizione); Altro
vi: Vị trí đặt vỏ dây an toàn: Dây đeo ngực; Dây đai ngang bụng; Dây đeo vai; Đa năng (mọi vị trí); Khác
lt-LT: Saugos diržo uždangalo vieta: Krūtinės diržas; Juosmens diržas; Pečių diržas; Universalu (bet kurioje pozicijoje); Kita
el: Τοποθέτηση καλύμματος ζώνης ασφαλείας: Ιμάντας στήθους; Ζώνη μέσης; Ιμάντας ώμου; Γενικής χρήσης (για κάθε θέση); Άλλο
sv: Placering av säkerhetsbältesskydd: Bröstrem; Höftbälte; Axelrem; Universell (valfri position); Övrigt